Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2028.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 32-9,100 is hereby revived and amended to read
as follows: 32-9,100. On and after January 1, 2013 January 1, 2025,
the Kansas department of wildlife, and parks and tourism shall offer a
resident senior combination hunting and fishing pass to residents of this
state who are 65 years of age or more. The fee for such pass shall be an
amount not to exceed 1/ the fee for a general combination lifetime
8
hunting and fishing license. The provisions of this section shall expire
on June 30, 2020.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-9,101 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-9,101. (a) (1) The secretary of wildlife and parks shall issue
and make available a Kansas kids lifetime combination hunting and
fishing license to any child who is a resident, as defined in K.S.A. 32-
701, and amendments thereto, and:
(A) Five years of age or younger, upon payment of a license fee
that shall not exceed $300; or
(B) six or seven through 15 years of age, upon payment of a
license fee that shall not exceed $500 $400.
(2) Such license fee may be paid on behalf of such child.
(b) The secretary of wildlife and parks shall report annually to the
house of representatives agriculture and natural resources budget
committee and the senate committee on agriculture and natural
resources, or the successor of such committees, on the number of such
Kansas kids lifetime combination hunting and fishing licenses issued
by the Kansas department of wildlife and parks.
(c) The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2032.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 32-939 is hereby amended to read as follows: 32-
939. (a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Department lands and waters" means lands, waters and
facilities that are under the jurisdiction and control of the secretary
through ownership, lease, license, cooperative agreement,
memorandum of understanding or other arrangement, including, but
not limited to, state parks, state lakes, recreational grounds, wildlife
areas, sanctuaries, fish hatcheries, natural areas and historic sites;
(2) "migratory waterfowl" means any wild goose, duck or
merganser; and
(3) "nonresident" means any person who has not been a bona fide
resident of this state for the immediately preceding 60 days.
"Nonresident" does not include:
(A) A nonresident lifetime license holder pursuant to K.S.A. 32-
930, and amendments thereto; or
(B) a nonresident entitled to resident licenses, permits, stamps and
other issues as authorized by K.S.A. 32-980, and amendments thereto.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law or rules and
regulations of the secretary and in addition to any other license, permit
or stamp required by law or rules and regulations of the secretary, a
valid state migratory waterfowl habitat stamp is required to hunt any
migratory waterfowl in this state.
(c)(2) The provisions of subsection (b) paragraph (1) do not apply
to hunting, by legal means, by a person not required by K.S.A. 32-919,
and amendments thereto, to hold a hunting license.
(d)(c) The stamp required by this section is valid throughout the
state.
(e)(d) The stamp required by this section is valid from the date of

HOUSE BILL No. 2028—page 2
issuance and expires at 12 midnight on June 30 following its the
issuance of such stamp.
(f)(e) Each migratory waterfowl habitat stamp shall be validated
by the signature of the stamp holder written across the face of such
stamp.
(f) The fee for a waterfowl stamp shall be the amount prescribed
pursuant to K.S.A. 32-988, and amendments thereto.
(g) Nonresidents shall not hunt or take migratory waterfowl
except on Sundays, Mondays and Tuesdays during any established
hunting season for migratory waterfowl.
(h) The restriction set forth by subsection (g) shall apply to:
(1) Department lands and waters;
(2) federal lands and waters owned by the United States and
administered by:
(A) The secretary of the army, United States army corps of
engineers at:
(i) The Big Hill, Clinton, Council Grove, El Dorado, Elk City, Fall
River, Hillsdale, John Redmond, Kanopolis, Marion, Melvern, Milford,
Perry, Pomona, Toronto, Tuttle Creek and Wilson reservoirs; and
(ii) Missouri river fish and wildlife mitigation lands, including,
but not limited to, Benedictine Bottoms, Burr Oak, Dalbey, Elwood and
Oak Mills;
(B) the United States department of the interior, bureau of
reclamation at Cedar Bluff, Cheney, Glen Elder, Lovewell, Norton and
Webster reservoirs; and
(C) the United States department of the interior, United States fish
and wildlife service at Flint Hills national wildlife refuge, Quivira
national refuge, Marais Des Cygnes national wildlife refuge and
Kirwin national wildlife refuges.
(i) The restriction set forth by subsection (g) shall not apply to:
(1) Property enrolled and designated as either a walk-in hunting
access area or an interactive walk-in hunting access area;
(2) navigable rivers in Kansas; or
(3) the conservation order for light geese season as provided in 50
C.F.R. § 21.180.
(j) The department of wildlife and parks shall prepare and present
a report on migratory waterfowl hunting to the house standing
committee on agriculture and natural resources and the senate
standing committee on agriculture and natural resources or any
successor committee on or before January 31, 2026, and January 31,
2027. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the impact of this
act on migratory waterfowl hunting and any relevant data, including
economic data, related to migratory waterfowl hunting.
(k) Subsections (g), (h) and (i) shall expire on July 1, 2028.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-988 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-988. (a) The secretary is authorized to adopt, in accordance
with K.S.A. 32-805, and amendments thereto, rules and regulations
fixing the amount of fees for the following items, subject to the
following limitations and subject to the requirement that no such rules
and regulations shall be adopted as temporary rules and regulations:
Big game permits
Resident (other than elk permit): maximum $100
Nonresident (other than elk permit): maximum $400
Elk permit: maximum $350
Nonresident mule deer stamp: maximum $150
Nonresident applications: maximum $25
Combination hunting and fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $50
Lifetime: maximum $1,000; or 8 quarterly payments, each
maximum $150
Nonresident: maximum $200
Commercial dog training permits: maximum $25
Commercial guide permit or associate guide permit
Resident: maximum $250

HOUSE BILL No. 2028—page 3
Nonresident: maximum $1,000
Commercial harvest or dealer permits: maximum $200
Commercial prairie rattlesnake harvesting permits
Resident or nonresident with valid hunting license: maximum $5
Resident or nonresident nonfirearm without valid hunting license:
maximum $20
Controlled shooting area operator license: maximum $400
Duplicate licenses, permits, stamps and other issues of the department:
maximum $10
Falconry
Permits: maximum $300
Examinations: maximum $100
Field trial permits: maximum $25
Fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $25
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident: maximum $75
Five-day nonresident: maximum $25
Institutional group: maximum $200
Special nonprofit group: maximum $200
Twenty-four-hour: maximum $10
Fur dealer licenses
Resident: maximum $200
Nonresident: maximum $400
Furharvester licenses
Resident: maximum $25
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident: maximum $400
Game breeder permits: maximum $15
Persons with a physical or developmental disability hunting and fishing
permits: maximum $5
Hound trainer-breeder running permits: maximum $25
Hunting licenses
Resident: maximum $25
Lifetime: maximum $500; or 8 quarterly payments, each maximum
$75
Nonresident 16 or more years of age: maximum $125
Nonresident under 16 years of age: maximum $75
Controlled shooting area: maximum $25
Forty-eight-hour waterfowl permits: maximum $25
Migratory waterfowl habitat stamps: maximum $8
Mussel fishing licenses
Resident: maximum $200 $20
Nonresident: maximum $1,500 $100
Rabbit permits
Live trapping: maximum $200
Shipping: maximum $400
Raptor propagation permits: maximum $100
Rehabilitation permits: maximum $50
Scientific, educational or exhibition permits: maximum $10
Wildlife damage control permits: maximum $10
Wildlife importation permits: maximum $10
Wild turkey permits
Resident: maximum $100
Nonresident: maximum $400
Resident turkey tag: maximum $20
Nonresident turkey tag: maximum $30
Special permits under K.S.A. 32-961, and amendments thereto:
maximum $100
Miscellaneous fees
Special events on department land or water: maximum $200
Special departmental services, materials or supplies: no maximum

HOUSE BILL No. 2028—page 4
Other issues of department: no maximum
Vendor bond: no maximum
(b) The fee for a landowner-tenant resident big game or wild
turkey hunting permit shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a
2
general resident big game or wild turkey hunting permit.
(c) The fee for a big game or wild turkey hunting permit for a
resident under 16 years of age shall be an amount not to exceed 1/ the
2
fee for a general resident big game or wild turkey hunting permit.
(d) The fee for a furharvester license for a resident under 16 years
of age shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a resident furharvester
2
license.
(e) For a resident who is at least 65 years of age, but less than 75
years of age:
(1) The fee for an annual hunting license shall be an amount equal
to 1/ the fee for a general annual hunting license;
2
(2) the fee for an annual fishing license shall be an amount equal
to 1/ the fee for a general annual fishing license; and
2
(3) the fee for an annual combination hunting and fishing license
shall be an amount equal to 1/ the fee for a general annual combination
2
hunting and fishing license.
(f) Any person who is a resident of this state and satisfies the
requirements to be considered a disabled veteran under K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 32-934, and amendments thereto, shall be exempt from the
hunting and fishing license fees listed in subsection (a).
(g) The secretary may establish, by rules and regulations adopted
in accordance with K.S.A. 32-805, and amendments thereto, different
fees for various classes and types of licenses, permits, stamps and other
issuances of the department which may occur within each item as
described under subsection (a).

HOUSE BILL No. 2028—page 5
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 32-939 and 32-9,100, as revived and amended by
section 1 of this act, K.S.A. 32-9,100, as amended by section 64 of
chapter 7 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp.
32-988 and 32-9,101 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 6. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.